Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-1107
Order; surviving spouse; payment option.

A qualified domestic relations order may provide that a spouse under a judgment for separate maintenance or a former spouse is considered the surviving spouse under the plan. If the order requires the member to select a payment option with survivorship rights, the Public Employees Retirement Board shall require consent by such spouse for the selection of the annuity option by the member or for any change in the selection of the annuity option by the member. The order may specifically require that the annuity option be a joint and survivor annuity.

Laws 1996, LB 1273, § 7.